Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 2 Trout Fishing

27-4-50.
Manner of fishing; moving of trout.

It shall be unlawful to fish for trout in any waters designated as trout waters pursuant to Code Section 27-4-51 by any means other than using one pole and line held in hand.

It shall be unlawful to use live fish for bait in any waters designated as trout waters pursuant to Code Section 27-4-51, except as authorized by the board.

It shall be unlawful to move trout from any of the fresh waters of this state to any other fresh waters of this state, except that authorized agents of the department may move trout as necessary for purposes of fisheries management, conservation, and restoration.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-715, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 543, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1550, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 9/HB 869.

Cross references.

Trout stamps, §§

27-2-4(c)

,

27-2-6

.

27-4-51.
Designation of certain waters as trout waters; establishment of seasons and methods of fishing.

The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations as may be appropriate based on sound wildlife management principles designating all or any portion of any watershed, stream, or lake as trout waters and establishing seasons, times, and methods of fishing in such waters.

It shall be unlawful to fish in any waters which the board designates as trout waters except during such times and in such methods as the board establishes by rule or regulation.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-716, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 537, § 6; Ga. L. 1995, p. 543, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1550, § 4.

27-4-52.
[Repealed] Trout waters without seasons.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-717, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 51; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 28; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1771, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 537, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1552, § 7; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1466, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 543, § 7; repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1550, § 5, effective October 1, 1998.

27-4-53.
[Repealed] Trout waters with seasons.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-718, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 52; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 29; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1771, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 20; Ga. L. 1995, p. 543, § 8; repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1550, § 6, effective October 1, 1998.